test/src/morphology/morottaja-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - njamma: # â-stems Morottaja
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: njaaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com: njammain
    njamma+N+Ess: njamman
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: njamaittáá

  Noun - hattâ: # â-stems Morottaja
    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: hattâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: haađâ
    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: hattân
    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: haađâst
    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: haađáin
    hattâ+N+Ess: hattân
    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: hađâittáá

  Noun - čááná: # â-stems Morottaja
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom: čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen: čáná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill: čáánán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc: čáánáást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com: čáánáin
    čááná+N+Ess: čáánnán
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe: čánáittáá

  Noun - spaha: # a-stems
    spaha+N+Sg+Nom: spaha
    spaha+N+Sg+Gen: spava
    spaha+N+Sg+Ill: spahan
    spaha+N+Sg+Loc: spavvaast
    spaha+N+Sg+Com: spavvaain
    spaha+N+Ess: spahhaan
    spaha+N+Pl+Abe: spavaittáá

  Noun - tuppâ: # â-stems Morottaja
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Nom: tuppâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuuvâ
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuuvân
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuuvâst
    tuppâ+N+Sg+Com: tuuváin
    tuppâ+N+Ess: tuppân
    tuppâ+N+Pl+Abe: tupâittáá

  Noun - vuoli: # i-stems Morottaja
    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: vuoli
    vuoli+N+Sg+Ill: vuolin
    vuoli+N+Sg+Loc: vuolist
    vuoli+N+Sg+Com: vuolijn
    vuoli+N+Ess: vuollin
    vuoli+N+Pl+Abe: vuolijttáá

  Noun - ito: # â-stems Morottaja
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: ito
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: iiđooin
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iđoittáá

  Noun - vašo: # â-stems Morottaja
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen: vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill: vašon
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc: vaššoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com: vaššooin
    vašo+N+Ess: vašsoon
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe: vašoittáá
